tr: Hedef bileşenleri: Hava girişi (genel); Karbüratör (iç kanallar/püskürtücüler); Karbüratör dışı; Jikle kelebeği/bağlantısı; Yanma odası/üst silindir; EGR bileşenleri; Emme manifoldu; Gaz kelebeği gövdesi; Valfler (emme); Diğer
bg-BG: Компоненти на мишената: Въздухозаборник (общ); Карбуратор (вътрешни канали/жигльори); Карбуратор (външна част); Смукателна клапа/механизъм; Горивна камера/горен цилиндър; EGR компоненти; Смукателен колектор; Дроселова клапа; Клапани (смукателни); Друго
lt-LT: Tiksliniai komponentas: Oro įsiurbimas (bendras); Karbiuratorius (vidiniai kanalai / purkštukai); Karbiuratoriaus išorė; Droselinė sklendė / traukė; Degimo kamera / viršutinis cilindras; EGR komponentai; Įsiurbimo kolektorius; Droselinės sklendės korpusas; Vožtuvai (įsiurbimo); Kita
el: Εξαρτήματα στόχου: Εισαγωγή αέρα (γενικά); Καρμπιρατέρ (εσωτερικά περάσματα/ζιγκλέρ); Εξωτερικό καρμπιρατέρ; Πεταλούδα τσοκ/σύνδεσμος; Θάλαμος καύσης/άνω κύλινδρος; Εξαρτήματα EGR; Πολλαπλή εισαγωγής; Σώμα πεταλούδας; Βαλβίδες (εισαγωγής); Άλλο
de: Anwendungsziele: Lufteinlass (allgemein); Vergaser (interne Kanäle/Düsen); Vergaser (außen); Starterklappe/Gestänge; Brennraum/oberer Zylinder; AGR-Komponenten; Ansaugkrümmer; Drosselklappengehäuse; Ventile (Einlass); Sonstige
pl: Elementy celu: Wlot powietrza (ogólne); Gaźnik (kanały wewnętrzne/dysze); Zewnętrzna część gaźnika; Płytka przepustnicy / układ cięgien; Komora spalania / górna część cylindra; Elementy układu EGR; Kolektor dolotowy; Korpus przepustnicy; Zawory (dolotowe); Inne
hr-HR: Komponente mete: Usis zraka (općenito); Rasplinjač (unutarnji prolazi/mlaznice); Vanjski dio rasplinjača; Leptir čoka / polužje; Komora za izgaranje / gornji dio cilindra; Komponente EGR ventila; Usisna grana; Kućište leptira gasa; Ventili (usisni); Ostalo
es: Componentes del objetivo: Toma de aire (general); Carburador (conductos internos/chicleres); Exterior del carburador; Mariposa de estrangulación/varillaje; Cámara de combustión/cilindro superior; Componentes EGR; Múltiple de admisión; Cuerpo de aceleración; Válvulas (admisión); Otros
ko: 대상 부품: 공기 흡입구(일반); 기화기(내부 통로/제트); 기화기 외부; 초크 플레이트/링키지; 연소실/상부 실린더; EGR 구성 요소; 흡기 매니폴드; 스로틀 바디; 밸브(흡기); 기타
zh-CN: 目标清洁部件: 进气口（一般）; 化油器（内部通道/喷嘴）; 化油器外部; 阻风门/连杆; 燃烧室/气缸上部; EGR 组件; 进气歧管; 节气门; 气门（进气）; 其他
fi: Kohdekomponentit: Ilmanotto (yleinen); Kaasutin (sisäiset kanavat / suuttimet); Kaasuttimen ulkopuoli; Rikastinläppä/-vivusto; Palotila/yläsylinteri; EGR-komponentit; Imusarja; Kaasuläppäkotelo; Venttiilit (imu); Muu
cs: Komponenty terče: Sání vzduchu (obecné); Karburátor (vnitřní kanálky/trysky); Vnějšek karburátoru; Klapka sytiče / táhlo; Spalovací komora / horní válec; Komponenty EGR; Sací potrubí; Škrticí klapka; Ventily (sací); Jiné
ro-RO: Componente vizate: Admisie aer (general); Carburator (pasaje interne/jicloare); Exterior carburator; Clapetă de șoc/tijă; Cameră de ardere/cilindru superior; Componente EGR; Colector de admisie; Corp clapetă de accelerație; Supape (admisie); Altele
ru: Компоненты мишени: Воздухозаборник (общее); Карбюратор (внутренние каналы/жиклёры); Карбюратор (внешняя часть); Воздушная заслонка/тяги; Камера сгорания/верхняя часть цилиндра; Компоненты EGR; Впускной коллектор; Дроссельная заслонка; Клапаны (впускные); Другое
en: Target components: Air intake (general); Carburetor (internal passages/jets); Carburetor exterior; Choke plate/linkage; Combustion chamber/upper cylinder; EGR components; Intake manifold; Throttle body; Valves (intake); Other
pt-BR: Componentes-alvo: Entrada de ar (geral); Carburador (passagens internas/giclês); Exterior do carburador; Borboleta do afogador/articulação; Câmara de combustão/cilindro superior; Componentes EGR; Coletor de admissão; Corpo de borboleta; Válvulas (admissão); Outros
sl-SI: Komponente tarče: Dovod zraka (splošno); Uplinjač (notranji kanali/šobe); Zunanjost uplinjača; Loputa zraka/vzvod; Zgorevalna komora/zgornji valj; Komponente EGR; Sesalni kolektor; Ohišje dušilne lopute; Ventili (sesalni); Drugo
th: ส่วนประกอบเป้าหมาย: ท่อไอดี (ทั่วไป); คาร์บูเรเตอร์ (ท่อภายใน/นมหนู); คาร์บูเรเตอร์ภายนอก; แผ่นโช้ก/ก้านต่อ; ห้องเผาไหม้/กระบอกสูบส่วนบน; ชิ้นส่วน EGR; ท่อร่วมไอดี; ลิ้นปีกผีเสื้อ; วาล์ว (ไอดี); อื่นๆ
hu: Célkomponensek: Légbeömlő (általános); Karburátor (belső járatok / fúvókák); Karburátor külseje; Szívató szelep / rudazat; Égéstér / felső henger; EGR alkatrészek; Szívósor; Fojtószelep; Szelepek (szívó); Egyéb
ja: ターゲットコンポーネント: 吸気口 (全般); キャブレター (内部通路/ジェット); キャブレター外装; チョークプレート/リンケージ; 燃焼室/アッパーシリンダー; EGRコンポーネント; インテークマニホールド; スロットルボディ; バルブ (吸気); その他
sk-SK: Cieľové komponenty: Prívod vzduchu (všeobecne); Karburátor (vnútorné kanáliky/dýzy); Exteriér karburátora; Klapka sýtiča/tiahla; Spaľovacia komora/horný valec; Komponenty EGR; Sacie potrubie; Škrtiaca klapka; Ventily (sacie); Iné
pt-PT: Componentes visados: Admissão de ar (geral); Carburador (passagens internas/injetores); Exterior do carburador; Borboleta do ar/articulação; Câmara de combustão/cilindro superior; Componentes EGR; Coletor de admissão; Corpo do acelerador; Válvulas (admissão); Outro
nl: Doelonderdelen: Luchtinlaat (algemeen); Carburateur (interne doorgangen/sproeiers); Buitenkant carburateur; Chokeklep/-stangen; Verbrandingskamer/bovenste cilinder; EGR-componenten; Inlaatspruitstuk; Gasklephuis; Kleppen (inlaat); Overig
da: Målkomponenter: Luftindtag (generelt); Karburator (indvendige kanaler/dyser); Karburator udvendig; Chokerspjæld/-forbindelse; Forbrændingskammer/øvre cylinder; EGR-komponenter; Indsugningsmanifold; Gasspjældhus; Ventiler (indsugning); Andet
fr: Composants ciblés: Prise d’air (général); Carburateur (passages internes/gicleurs); Extérieur du carburateur; Volet de départ/tringlerie; Chambre de combustion/haut de cylindre; Composants EGR; Collecteur d’admission; Corps de papillon; Soupapes (admission); Autre
nb: Målkomponenter: Luftinntak (generelt); Forgasser (innvendige kanaler/dyser); Forgasser utvendig; Chokespjeld/-kobling; Forbrenningskammer/øvre sylinder; EGR-komponenter; Innsugningsmanifold; Gasspjeldhus; Ventiler (inntak); Annet
vi: Các thành phần mục tiêu: Cửa hút gió (chung); Bộ chế hòa khí (đường dẫn/béc phun bên trong); Bên ngoài bộ chế hòa khí; Bướm gió/cơ cấu liên kết; Buồng đốt/xy lanh trên; Thành phần EGR; Cổ góp hút; Thân bướm ga; Van (nạp); Khác
sv: Delar som ingår för mål: Luftintag (allmänt); Förgasare (inre kanaler/munstycken); Förgasarens utsida; Chokereglage/länkage; Förbränningskammare/övre cylinder; EGR-komponenter; Insugsrör; Spjällhus; Ventiler (insug); Annat
it: Componenti interessati: Presa d'aria (generale); Carburatore (passaggi interni/getti); Esterno carburatore; Valvola a farfalla/tiranti; Camera di combustione/cilindro superiore; Componenti EGR; Collettore di aspirazione; Corpo farfallato; Valvole (aspirazione); Altro
zh-TW: 標靶組件: 進氣口 (一般); 化油器 (內部通道/噴嘴); 化油器外部; 阻風門/連桿; 燃燒室/上氣缸; EGR 零件; 進氣歧管; 節氣門; 氣門 (進氣); 其他